Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1762
Conflicts of interest.

No official, agent, or employee of a credit union shall in any manner, directly or indirectly, participate in the deliberation upon the determination of any question affecting that person's pecuniary interest or the pecuniary interest of any corporation, partnership, or association, other than the credit union, in which that person is directly or indirectly interested.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 62.